csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_oo.yaml
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookan
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookeg
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookang
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooken
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitookegon
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: wanitoosiidaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: wanitoosiidaanin
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoog,wanitook]
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: wanitoodaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: wanitoodaanin
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyeg
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaad
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonid
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitood
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoong
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiweg
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosigwaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosinig
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosig
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosing
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaambaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitooyegiban,wanitooyegoban]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyamban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaapan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonipan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoopan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoongiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaambaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoosiwegiban,wanitoosiwegoban]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwamban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosigwaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosinigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosingiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowegwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaagwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoogwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowiingen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwegwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaagwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiinigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwiingen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaambaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoowegibanen,wanitoowegobanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowambanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaagobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoogobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowiingibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaambaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoosiiwegibanen,wanitoosiiwegobanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwambanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaagobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiinigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwiingibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: niwanitoonan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niwanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: giwanitoonaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: giwanitoonaawaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: giwanitoonan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: giwanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: owanitoonaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: owanitoonaawaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owanitoonini,owanitooni]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owanitoonini,owanitooni]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: owanitoonan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: owanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Pl: niwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg: niwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Pl: giwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg: giwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: niwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: giwanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: giwanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: giwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: giwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: owanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: owanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owanitoosiinini,owanitoosiini]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owanitoosiinini,owanitoosiini]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: owanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: owanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Pl: niwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg: niwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Pl: giwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg: giwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [niwanitoonaabaniin,niwanitoonaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: niwanitoonaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [giwanitoonaawaabaniin,giwanitoonaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: giwanitoonaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [giwanitoonaabaniin,giwanitoonaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: giwanitoonaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [owanitoonaawaabaniin,owanitoonaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: owanitoonaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owanitooninaabaniin,owanitooninaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owanitooninaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [owanitoonaabaniin,owanitoonaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: owanitoonaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [niwanitoominaabaniin,niwanitoominaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg: niwanitoominaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [giwanitoominaabaniin,giwanitoominaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg: giwanitoominaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [niwanitoosiinaabaniin,niwanitoosiinaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: niwanitoosiinaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [giwanitoosiinaawaabaniin,giwanitoosiinaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: giwanitoosiinaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [giwanitoosiinaabaniin,giwanitoosiinaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: giwanitoosiinaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [owanitoosiinaawaabaniin,owanitoosiinaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: owanitoosiinaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owanitoosiinininaabaniin,owanitoosiinininaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owanitoosiininaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [owanitoosiinaabaniin,owanitoosiinaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: owanitoosiinaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [niwanitoosiiminaabaniin,niwanitoosiiminaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg: niwanitoosiiminaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [giwanitoosiiminaabaniin,giwanitoosiiminaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg: giwanitoosiiminaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: niwanitoonaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: niwanitoonaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: giwanitoonaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: giwanitoonaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: giwanitoonaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: giwanitoonaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: owanitoonaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: owanitoonaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: owanitooninaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owanitooninaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: owanitoonaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: owanitoonaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Pl: niwanitoominaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg: niwanitoominaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Pl: giwanitoominaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg: giwanitoominaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: niwanitoosiinaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: niwanitoosiinaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: giwanitoosiinaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: giwanitoosiinaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: giwanitoosiinaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: giwanitoosiinaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: owanitoosiinaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: owanitoosiinaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: owanitoosiininaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owanitoosiininaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: owanitoosiinaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: owanitoosiinaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Pl: niwanitoosiiminaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg: niwanitoosiiminaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Pl: giwanitoosiiminaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg: giwanitoosiiminaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
